Maine, session 132, LD281.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
School Finance and Operations Z078
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to the Maine Discovery Museum to support the Maine
Science Festival, the Maine Invention Convention and the Science Around ME program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $225,000 $225,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $225,000 $225,000